Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6742
Eligibility for Licensee Assistance Program.

Medication aides are eligible to participate in the Licensee Assistance Program as prescribed by section 38-175.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1291.